Arkansas, session 2025, HB1176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Public Safety - Division of Emergency Management for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U013U ADEM DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) D043C ADEM INFO TECHNOLOGY DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE IT08
(3) D014C STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IT08
(4) D122C IT PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE IT07
*DJC007*
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176
(5) D016C SENIOR TECHNOLOGY ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(6) D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST 2 GRADE IT04
(7) D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST 4 GRADE IT04
(8) D084C COMPUTER OPERATOR 1 GRADE IT02
(9) G350C ADEM SENIOR DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(10) G055C ADEM DEPUTY DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS12
(11) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(12) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(13) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(14) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(15) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(16) G140C ADEM PROGRAM MANAGER 8 GRADE GS08
(17) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
(18) V002C FEDERAL SURPLUS PROPERTY MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(19) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(20) V004C PROCUREMENT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(21) G157C ADEM AREA COORDINATOR 7 GRADE GS07
(22) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(23) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(24) A075C FINANCIAL ANALYST I 1 GRADE GS07
(25) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 6 GRADE GS07
(26) A063C RESEARCH & STATISTICS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(27) G175C ADEM PROGRAM COORDINATOR 8 GRADE GS06
(28) C120C ADEM SR EMERGENCY MGMT DUTY OFFICER 8 GRADE GS06
(29) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(30) G208C EMERGENCY PLANNER 5 GRADE GS06
(31) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
(32) G214C GRANTS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(33) G204C PLANNING SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(34) T061C SENIOR IA 1 GRADE GS06
(35) D074C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(36) E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR 1 GRADE GS06
(37) C038C ADEM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT DUTY OFFICER 1 GRADE GS05
(38) S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS05
(39) V014C BUYER 1 GRADE GS05
(40) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 5 GRADE GS05
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176
(41) S034C INTERSTATE TRUCK DRIVER 3 GRADE GS05
(42) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 5 GRADE GS04
(43) T079C FACILITY MANAGER II 1 GRADE GS04
(44) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS04
(45) V021C SURPLUS PROPERTY AGENT 3 GRADE GS04
(46) V019C SURPLUS PROPERTY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(47) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
(48) S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 112

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Public Safety - Division of Emergency Management for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: twenty-eight (28) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at
rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Emergency
Management - State Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,773,772
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,103,636
(03) OVERTIME 10,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 490,306
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,377,714

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services, operating expenses and First Responder and Homeland
Security Grants and Aid of the Department of Public Safety - Division of
Emergency Management - Federal Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $538,725
(02) EXTRA HELP 156,438
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 226,507
(04) OVERTIME 5,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,155,207
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) GRANTS / AID - FIRST RESPONDER &
HOMELAND SECURITY 10,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $12,281,877

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - DISASTER RELIEF GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services, operating expenses and Disaster Relief Grants and Aid of
the Department of Public Safety - Division of Emergency Management - Disaster
Relief Grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $536,763
(02) EXTRA HELP 625,751
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 305,243
(04) OVERTIME 175,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 120,850
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 30,000
(C) PROF. FEES 234,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) GRANTS/AID DISASTER RELIEF 436,491,222
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $438,519,329

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - HAZARDOUS MATERIALS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management Revolving Fund, for
personal services, operating expenses and Hazardous Materials Management
Grants and Aid of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Emergency
Management - Hazardous Materials for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $176,152
(02) EXTRA HELP 32,176
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 79,014
(04) OVERTIME 5,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 280,438
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 82,792
(C) PROF. FEES 25,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) GRANTS/AID - HAZARDOUS MATERIALS
MANAGEMENT 10,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $690,572
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - DISASTER RELIEF TRUST. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the
Arkansas Disaster Relief Program Trust Fund, for assistance to victims of
state or federally declared disasters of the Department of Public Safety -
Division of Emergency Management - Disaster Relief Trust for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS/AID - DISASTER RELIEF $639,365

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - RADIOLOGICAL EMERGENCY RESPONSE GRANTS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the
Department of Public Safety - Division of Emergency Management - Radiological
Emergency Response Grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $20,500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 19,500
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $40,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - EMERGENCY OPERATIONS CENTER - CASH. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of
Public Safety - Division of Emergency Management - Emergency Operations
Center - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EOC EXPENSES $207,440

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL SURPLUS PROPERTY PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the Federal Surplus Property Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Emergency
Management - Federal Surplus Property Program for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $669,627
(02) EXTRA HELP 6,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 284,197
(04) OVERTIME 30,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,092,031
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,000
(C) PROF. FEES 15,263
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,112,118

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS 911 RURAL ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services, operating
expenses and Enhancement Grants and Aid of the Department of Public Safety -
Division of Emergency Management - Arkansas 911 Rural Enhancement Program for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $94,061
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 30,227
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 937,636
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) ENHANCEMENT GRANTS 2,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,071,924

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - IMMEDIATE DISASTER RESPONSE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety - Division of
Emergency Management, to be payable from the Immediate Disaster Response
Fund, for immediate expenses related to disaster response requests for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) IMMEDIATE DISASTER RESPONSE $200,000

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS PUBLIC SAFETY TRUST. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety - Division of
Emergency Management, to be payable from the Arkansas Public Safety Trust
Fund, for disbursements related to costs that enhance, operate, and maintain
911 services in the State of Arkansas for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/INVESTMENTS/TRANSFERS $75,000,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS PUBLIC SAFETY TRUST FUND
ADMINISTRATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public
Safety, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for administrative
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Emergency
Management - Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund Administration for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS PUBLIC SAFETY TRUST FUND
ADMINISTRATION EXPENSES $168,000

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS WIRELESS INFORMATION NETWORK -
CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to
be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for expenses of the Department of
Public Safety - Division of Emergency Management - Arkansas Wireless
Information Network - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS WIRELESS INFORMATION NETWORK
EXPENSES $10,000,000

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS WIRELESS INFORMATION NETWORK.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Division of
Emergency Management - Arkansas Wireless Information Network for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $477,441
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 167,973
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 6,801,925
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,452,339

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - LEVEE MITIGATION - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for expenses related to levee mitigation efforts
throughout the State of Arkansas of the Department of Public Safety -
Division of Emergency Management - Levee Mitigation - Cash for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) LEVEE MITIGATION PROGRAM $3,246

SECTION 18. REGULAR SALARIES - OFFICE OF FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES.
There is hereby established for the Department of Public Safety - Division of
Emergency Management - Office of Fire Protection Services for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X224C STATE FIRE MARSHALL 1 GRADE GS12
(2) B021C LICENSED ARCHITECT 1 GRADE GS09
(3) X227C ADEM FIRE MARSHALL INSPECTOR 2 GRADE GS07
(4) S024C CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 5

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable
from the Fire Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Public Safety - Division of Emergency Management - Office
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176
of Fire Protection Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $261,744
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 131,295
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 29,423
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 150
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) FIRE SERVICES TRANSFER 1,600,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,022,612

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES BOARD. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety, to be payable from
the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for miscellaneous grants and
expenses of the Department of Public Safety - Division of Emergency
Management - Fire Protection Services Board for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FIRE PROTECTION GRANTS $30,000

SECTION 21. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.
01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007

HB1176

SECTION 22. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 23. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.















01/21/2025 7:46:23 AM DJC007